Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2480
Compensation of personal representative.

A personal representative is entitled to reasonable compensation for his services. If a will provides for compensation of the personal representative and there is no contract with the decedent regarding compensation, he may renounce the provision before qualifying and be entitled to reasonable compensation. A personal representative also may renounce his right to all or any part of the compensation. A written renunciation of fee may be filed with the court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 158, UPC § 3-719.

A personal representative’s right to reasonable compensation under this section exists independently of the rights of the estate. In re Estate of Gsantner, 288 Neb. 222, 846 N.W.2d 646 (2014).

It is within a trial court’s discretion to weigh the factors that are relevant to a determination of the reasonableness of a fee. In re Estate of Gsantner, 288 Neb. 222, 846 N.W.2d 646 (2014).

The factors in section 30-2482 provide an indication of what facts the Legislature intended to be considered when determining a reasonable fee. In re Estate of Gsantner, 288 Neb. 222, 846 N.W.2d 646 (2014).